Colorado, session 2026A, HB1177.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-6-208, add (6.5)
as follows:
25.5-6-208. Nursing facility provider reimbursement - rules -
definition - repeal.
(6.5) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO
THE CONTRARY, THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT MAKE A WAGE
ENHANCEMENT SUPPLEMENTAL PAYMENT TO AN ELIGIBLE NURSING HOME
PROVIDER ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION (6.5)
REGARDLESS OF WHEN THE SERVICES FOR WHICH WAGE ENHANCEMENT
SUPPLEMENTAL PAYMENTS ARE PROVIDED ARE DELIVERED.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 2. Appropriation to the department of health care policy and financing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section
2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part VI (2) and the affected totals as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART VI
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING
(2) MEDICAL SERVICES PREMIUMS
Medical and Long-Term
Care Services for Medicaid
Eligible Individuals 13,365,398,428 2,591,984,332(M) 1,292,968,309a 1,480,091,193b 124,197,922c 7,876,156,672
13,356,678,506 2,587,624,371(M) 7,871,796,711
a This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $1,121,530,725 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., $76,010,738 shall be from
recoveries and recoupments, $73,586,261 shall be from the Adult Dental Fund created in Section 25.5-5-207 (4)(a), C.R.S., $62,525,000 shall be from the Medicaid Nursing Facility
Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-6-203 (2)(a), C.R.S., $60,581,773 represents public funds certified as expenditures incurred by public emergency medical transportation providers,
$46,929,200 shall be from the Health Care Expansion Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(a)(I), C.R.S., $28,169,342 represents public funds certified as expenditures incurred by
public hospitals and agencies that are eligible for federal financial participation under the Medicaid program, $6,660,761 shall be from the Medicaid Buy-In Cash Fund created in Section
25.5-6-1404 (3)(b), C.R.S., $1,503,600 shall be from the Tobacco Tax Cash Fund created in section 24-22-117 (1)(a), C.R.S., and meets the requirement to appropriate a portion of the
revenues collected from the imposition of additional state cigarette and tobacco taxes to the Old Age Pension program for health related purposes pursuant to Section 21 of Article X
of the State Constitution, $857,151 shall be from the Tobacco Education Programs Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., $836,182 shall be from the Breast and Cervical
Cancer Prevention and Treatment Fund created in Section 25.5-5-308 (8)(a)(I), C.R.S., $700,000 shall be from an intergovernmental transfer from Denver Health, and $200,460 shall
be from the Service Fee Fund created in Section 25.5-6-204 (1)(c)(II), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $112,280,907 shall be transferred from the Department of Higher Education from the Fee-for-service Contracts with State Institutions for Speciality Education Programs
line item, $9,253,841 shall be transferred from the Old Age Pension State Medical Program line item appropriation in the Other Medical Services division of this department, $1,505,000
shall be from the Department of Early Childhood from the Home Visiting line item, and $1,158,174 shall be transferred from Public School Health Services line item in the Other Medical
Services division of this department.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1177

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
TOTALS PART VI
(HEALTH CARE
POLICY AND
FINANCING)25 $18,165,190,661 $4,247,295,247 $1,293,261,386a $2,002,883,994b $144,020,883 $10,477,729,151c
$18,156,470,739 $4,242,935,286 $10,473,369,190c
a Of this amount, $1,292,968,309 shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S., and $293,077 shall be General Fund Exempt pursuant to
Section 24-22-117 (1)(c)(I)(B.5), C.R.S. Said $293,077 is not subject to the statutory limitation on General Fund appropriations imposed by Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $22,358,429 contains an (I) notation.
c Of this amount, $424,775,104 contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1177

SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1177